Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-4] Nursing facility
sustainability program special fund. [Section repealed December 31,
2017. L 2016, c 59, §2.] (a) There is created in the state
treasury the nursing facility sustainability program special fund to be
administered by the department into which shall be deposited all moneys
collected under this chapter.

(b) Moneys in the special fund shall consist
of:

(1) All revenues collected or received by the
department from the nursing facility sustainability fee required by this
chapter;

(2) All federal medicaid funds received by the
department as a result of matching expenditures made with the nursing facility
sustainability fees;

(3) Any interest or penalties levied in conjunction
with the administration of this chapter; and

(4) Any appropriations, federal funds, donations,
gifts, or moneys from any other sources.

(c) Revenue from the nursing facility
sustainability fee shall be used exclusively as follows:

(1) No less than eighty-eight per cent of the revenue
from the nursing facility sustainability fee shall be used to match federal
medicaid funds, with the combined total to be used to enhance capitated rates
to medicaid managed care health plans for the purpose of increasing medicaid
payments to private nursing facilities;

(2) Twelve per cent of the revenue from the nursing
facility sustainability fee may be used by the department for other
departmental purposes; and

(3) All moneys remaining in the special fund on
December 30, 2017, shall be distributed to nursing facilities within
thirty days in the same proportions as received from the nursing facilities.

(d) The department shall utilize federal funds
derived from state long-term care facility certified expenditures to make
supplemental payments to state long-term care facilities to the extent
permitted by federal law. The department may receive intergovernmental
transfers from the state long-term care facilities to support direct
supplemental payments and increased capitation rates to health plans for the
benefit of the state long-term care facilities. During any period in which the
nursing facility sustainability fee is in effect, certified expenditures of
state long-term care facilities shall not be used to make or support direct
payments to private nursing facilities. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L
2013, c 142, §§2(1), 3; am L 2014, c 124, §§1(1), 2; am L 2015, c 69, §§1(1),
2; am L 2016, c 59, §1(1)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next